Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1408
Directors; duties and powers; annual and special meetings; notice.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one or more regular meetings annually. The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time; and ten percent of the members may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time. Such meeting must thereupon be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least ten days prior to the meeting; Provided, however, that the bylaws may require instead that such notice may be given by publication in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation, in the territory in which the association has its membership.

Laws 1925, c. 80, § 8, p. 251;

C.S.1929, § 24-1408;

R.S.1943, § 21-1408.